fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-3-nîtim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - nîtim :

      # Core

      # Poss
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nîtim   #  my cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kîtim   #  your cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: wîtimwa   #  his/her other cross-cousin(s)
      

      # Der/Dim
      nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: [nîcimos, nîcimosis]   #  a little cross-cousin
      

      # Poss # Sg
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nîtim   #  my cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kîtim   #  your cross-cousin
      
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nîtimonân   #  our cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px12Pl+Sg: kîtimonaw   #  your and our cross-cousin
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kîtimowâw   #  your cross-cousin
            

      # Poss # Pl
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nîtimwak   #  my cross-cousins
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kîtimwak   #  your cross-cousins
      
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nîtimonânak   #  our cross-cousins
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px12Pl+Pl: kîtimonawak   #  your and our cross-cousins
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kîtimowâwak   #  your cross-cousins
      
            
      # Poss # Obv
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: nîtimwa   #  my other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kîtimwa   #  your other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: wîtimwa   #  his/her other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: nîtimonâna   #  our other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px12Pl+Obv: kîtimonawa   #  your and our other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kîtimowâwa   #  your other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: wîtimowâwa   #  their other cross-cousin(s)
      nîtim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: wîtimothiwa   #  another's/others' other cross-cousin(s)
      
